Nebraska, session 109, LB1181A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $50,000 from the Victim's
Compensation Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $50,000 from the Victim's Compensation
Fund for FY2027-28 to the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice, for Program 206, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative
Bill 1181, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$50,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2027-28 $50,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
-1-